Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7534
Electronic filings and correspondence.

The director may make reasonable arrangements and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to allow or to facilitate the use of electronic media to make filings or to engage in correspondence required by the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 34.